Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1704
Ownership agreement; terms and conditions.

If a public entity enters into an ownership agreement of any electric facility pursuant to section 18-412.09, the agreement may contain such terms and conditions as the public entity may determine.

Laws 2004, LB 969, § 4.